New York, session 2025-2026, S6698.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3005-a of the public health law, 2 as amended by chapter 445 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The following staffing standards shall be in effect unless other- 5 wise provided by this section: 6 (a) effective January first, nineteen hundred ninety-seven the minimum 7 staffing standard for a registered ambulance service shall be a certi- 8 fied first responder with the patient; 9 (b) effective January first, two thousand, the minimum staffing stand- 10 ard for a voluntary ambulance service shall be an emergency medical 11 technician with the patient; 12 (c) (i) the minimum staffing standard for ambulance units responding 13 to calls for emergency medical services in the 911 system in a city with 14 a population of over one million people shall be (1) a team of two 15 certified emergency medical technicians; or (2) a team of two certified 16 advanced emergency medical technicians. 17 (ii) the minimum standard for staffing supervisors' vehicles respond- 18 ing to calls for emergency medical services in the 911 system in a city 19 with a population of over one million people shall be a team of one 20 supervisor who is certified either as an emergency medical technician or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11189-02-5 S. 6698--A 2 1 as an advanced emergency medical technician, paired with one certified 2 emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician; 3 (d) the minimum staffing standard for all other ambulance services 4 shall be an emergency medical technician with the patient; and 5 [(d)] (e) the minimum staffing standard for an advanced life support 6 first response service shall be an advanced emergency medical technician 7 with the patient. Circumstances permitting other than advanced life 8 support care by an advanced life support first response service may be 9 established by rule by the state council, subject to the approval of the 10 commissioner. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 12 subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 3005-a of 13 the public health law as added by section one of this act shall take 14 effect 1 year after it shall have become a law.